Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
State Parks Capital Maintenance and Renovation

148.800.
Park capital maintenance and renovation fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a separate trust and agency account to be known as the “Park Capital Maintenance and Renovation Fund” to be administered by the Department of Parks, with the approval of the Governor’s Office for Policy and Management, for the purposes provided for in KRS 148.800 to 148.810. The balance of any moneys accruing to this fund in any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year or biennium.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 433, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

148.805.
Moneys attributable to increases in fees and charges after August 1, 1994, to be deposited in fund.

On or after August 1, 1994, there shall be deposited in the fund created in KRS 148.800, the moneys attributable to any increase in fees and charges at the state’s parks made by the department and designated by the commissioner as an increase for the purpose of KRS 148.800 to 148.810.

Any increase in fees and charges made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be used to supplement rather than to replace other anticipated department funding sources or budgeted expenditure accounts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 433, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

148.810.
Use of moneys in fund.

Funds in the park capital maintenance and renovation fund shall be used for the maintenance and renovation of park facilities. Maintenance shall include equipment purchases, used primarily in the maintenance of infrastructure and park facilities, and expenditures related to preventative maintenance of capital assets. Renovation includes the replacement of depreciable assets, including furnishings, and purchase of depreciable assets which enhance the quality of the parks.

In no case shall the moneys from the fund be expended on:

New capital project construction;

Any new maintenance or renovation project estimated to cost four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) or more in cash or other consideration; or

Any new item of equipment estimated to cost one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more in cash or other consideration.

Moneys in the park capital maintenance and renovation fund may be used to provide additional funding for any capital project, as defined in KRS 45.750, that received line item authorization from the General Assembly in any executive branch budget bill only if the state budget director or the director’s designee submits the proposed allocation to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, in accordance with the provisions of KRS 45.800.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 45.760(6), moneys in the park capital maintenance and renovation fund shall not be used to provide additional funding for any capital project, as defined in KRS 45.750, that received line item authorization from the General Assembly in any executive branch budget bill, and that has already received maximum additional funding as permitted by KRS 45.760(6) unless the state budget director or the director’s designee submits the proposed allocation to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee at least fourteen (14) days prior to the committee meeting, in accordance with the provisions of KRS 45.800. In addition to the requirements of KRS 45.800, the submission shall include a written certification that:

Due to extraordinary circumstances, which shall be described, additional funds are necessary for the project to be completed in a manner that will allow it to serve its intended purpose; and

The use of funds from the parks capital maintenance and renovation fund do not unduly compromise the routine maintenance and renovation needs that the fund was created to address.

The commissioner shall, by September 1 of each year, report to the Legislative Research Commission the receipts, expenditures, and any amounts carried forward for the fiscal year ending on June 30 of that year from the fund established in KRS 148.800.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 433, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 38, effective June 25, 2009.

148.815.
State Parks Commission. [Repealed.]

148.820.
Meetings of commission — Duties of commission. [Repealed.]

148.825.
Inspection of state park facilities by commission — Access to grounds, buildings, and records. [Repealed.]